Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4713
Saving provision.

If a right with respect to property to which the Uniform Community Property Disposition at Death Act applies is acquired, extinguished, or barred on the expiration of a limitation period that began to run under another statute before July 19, 2024, that statute continues to apply to the right even if the statute has been repealed or superseded by the Uniform Community Property Disposition at Death Act.

Laws 2024, LB83, § 13.